District of Columbia statutes.
40-203

Liability for failure to pay hospital’s lien.

Any person or persons, firm or firms, corporation or corporations, including an insurance carrier, making any payment to such patient or to his attorneys or heirs or legal representatives as compensation for the injury sustained, after the filing and mailing of such notice without paying to such hospital the amount of its lien or so much thereof as can be satisfied out of the moneys due under any final judgment or compromise or settlement agreement after paying the amount of any prior liens, shall for a period of 1 year from the date of payment to such patient or his heirs, attorneys, or legal representatives, as aforesaid, be and remain liable to such hospital for the amount which such hospital was entitled to receive as aforesaid; and any such association, corporation, or other institution, and any agency of the United States or the District of Columbia, maintaining such hospital, may, within such period, enforce its lien by a suit at law against such person or persons, firm or firms, corporation or corporations making any such payment.

History

June 30, 1939, 53 Stat. 990, ch. 255, § 3
June 19, 1948, 62 Stat. 496, ch. 525, § 2

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 38-303.
1973 Ed., § 38-303.